District of Columbia statutes.
2-356.01

Project delivery methods authorized.

(a)

This subchapter shall govern procurements for construction projects and related management services in the District.

(b)

The following project delivery methods are authorized for procurements within the scope of this subchapter:

(1)

Architectural and engineering services;

(2)

Construction management;

(3)

Construction management at risk;

(4)

Design-bid-build;

(5)

Design-build;

(6)

Design-build-finance-operate-maintain;

(7)

Design-build-operate-maintain; and

(8)

Operations and maintenance.

(c)

Participation in a report or study that is subsequently used in the preparation of design requirements for a project shall not disqualify a firm from participating as a member of a proposing team in a design-build, design-build-operate-maintain, or design-build-finance-operate-maintain procurement unless the participation would provide the firm with a substantial competitive advantage.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 601, 58 DCR 1185
This section is referenced in § 2-356.02 and § 2-357.04.